South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S132.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  If Scout Motors has violated Section 56-15-45(D) with its vehicle deposit program, or if Scout Motors has otherwise violated the laws of this State, then Scout Motors must (1) immediately repay the $200,000 loan from the State with the agreed upon interest rate and (2) repay the State for any of its expenditures from the $1,091,082,986 appropriated to the Department of Commerce that benefitted Scout Motors, whether directly or indirectly. Any repayment of funds from the $1,091,082,986 appropriation must be repaid within twenty-four months from the date that Scout Motors was notified of the violation. Repayments required pursuant to this provision must be made to the General Fund. SECTION 2.  If Scout Motors has violated Section 56-15-45(D) with its vehicle deposit program, or if Scout Motors has otherwise violated the laws of this State, then the Department of Commerce shall end all projects that have commenced and shall not initiate any new projects related to the incentive package. All unspent funds shall be returned to the General Fund. SECTION 3.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----